Oklahoma, session 2026, SB267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3319 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 737 Page 1


A. There is hereby established the School of American Civic


Thought and Leadership at the University of Oklahoma. The purpose


of the school shall be to:


1. Educate students in the principles, ideals, and institutions


of the American political order including the character traits and


durable habits necessary to sustain that order;


2. Educate students in the philosophical foundations of


responsible leadership and informed citizenship;


3. Promote and provide programming related to civic education,


engagement, and discourse;


4. Enhance education in the fields of political thought and


science, American history and government, free market economics, and


other related fields as appropriate, with a focus on the foundations


of Western and American civilization including its great books, the


rights and responsibilities of American citizenship, fundamental


democratic principles and mores, and the ways in which those


principles and mores are expressed in and through mediating


institutions at the federal, state, and local levels;


5. Provide viewpoint and ideologically diverse resources to


students, faculty, state government agencies and actors, educators,


and the general public regarding civic affairs; and


6. Assist in ensuring that the University of Oklahoma serve as


a robust marketplace of ideas for all students and faculty.



Req. No. 737 Page 2


B. To carry out the purposes set forth in subsection A of this


section, the school is authorized to:


1. Enroll students;


2. Hire tenure-track and non-tenured faculty and supporting


staff;


3. Develop and offer in-person courses and online instruction


in new graduate and undergraduate major and minor programs;


4. Develop an undergraduate American institutions and civic


knowledge course in anticipation of a future mandate requiring all


University of Oklahoma students to complete such a course to


graduate;


5. Offer general education and honors courses including courses


intended for incoming freshman students;


6. Offer concurrent enrollment;


7. Provide and facilitate internships and other relevant


experiences for students and the general public;


8. Hold events; and


9. Take other actions as appropriate subject to the supervision


of the school’s director and the general supervision of the Provost


of the University of Oklahoma.


C. Upon its establishment, the School of American Civic Thought


and Leadership may be physically housed on the University of


Oklahoma’s Norman campus.



Req. No. 737 Page 3


D. The School of American Civic Thought and Leadership shall


operate as an academic unit within the University of Oklahoma.


E. The School of American Civic Thought and Leadership and its


director shall be advised by an advisory board on matters related to


the school including, but not limited to, staffing, curriculum,


policy, and programming in accordance with the policies and


procedures of the University of Oklahoma. The advisory board shall


be comprised of six (6) members of the Board of Regents of the


University of Oklahoma, to be appointed by the chair of the Board of


Regents. The Provost of the University of Oklahoma shall serve as


chair of the advisory board. Members shall be appointed by December


31, 2025.


F. By March 31, 2026, the advisory board, or a committee


appointed by the board, shall conduct a national search and transmit


to the Provost of the University of Oklahoma a list of finalists for


the position of director of the school. The Provost of the


University of Oklahoma shall provide all necessary administrative


support for the search. The Provost of the University of Oklahoma


shall appoint the director from the list of finalists provided by


the advisory board. If the position of director becomes vacant, the


provisions of this subsection shall govern appointment of a new


director. During the term of the vacancy, the Provost of the


University of Oklahoma may designate a member of the school’s


faculty to serve as interim director until the vacancy is filled.

Req. No. 737 Page 4


The Provost of the University of Oklahoma may remove the director of


the school in accordance with policies and procedures of the


University of Oklahoma. The director shall:


1. Report to the Provost of the University of Oklahoma;


2. Except for his or her own appointment, make all faculty and


staff hiring decisions for the school;


3. Operate the school in accordance with policies and


procedures of the University of Oklahoma; and


4. By March 1, 2027, and by each March 1 thereafter, develop


and provide an annual strategic plan for the school to the Provost


of the University of Oklahoma and the advisory board.


G. Faculty of the school may be awarded tenure subject to the


tenure policies of the University of Oklahoma as adopted by the


Board of Regents of the University of Oklahoma and shall not be


required to gain joint appointment in another division of the


University of Oklahoma. If a faculty member is awarded tenure and


the school later dissolves, the faculty member shall be relocated


within another academic unit of the University of Oklahoma.


H. The Board of Regents of the University of Oklahoma may use


funds allocated to it by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education and charitable donations to fund the school. Allocated


and donated funds shall only be used for the direct operation of the


school.



Req. No. 737 Page 5


I. By September 1, 2027, and by each September 1 thereafter,


the Provost of the University of Oklahoma, in consultation with the


director of the school and the school’s advisory board, shall


electronically submit a report to the Governor, the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives,


and the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee and the House


of Representatives Appropriations and Budget Committee.


SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education from any monies not otherwise


appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for


the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, the sum of Five Million


Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for


the purpose of implementing the provisions of Section 1 of this act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-737 EB 12/30/2024 7:53:42 PM









Req. No. 737 Page 6